Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-903
Medical assistance program; established.

The medical assistance program is established, which shall also be known as medicaid.

Laws 1965, c. 397, § 3, p. 1277;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 68-1018;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 3.

Nebraska has elected to participate in the federal Medicaid program through the enactment of this section. Boruch v. Nebraska Dept. of Health and Human Servs., 11 Neb. App. 713, 659 N.W.2d 848 (2003).